District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34n

Fiscal impact of issuance.

For the purposes of determining the fiscal impact of this subpart [§§ 2-1217.34a to 2-1217.34n], the Bonds shall be deemed to be issued under the authority of subchapter IX-A of Chapter 12 of this title [§ 2-1217.71 et seq.], as a project within the 7th Street/Georgia Avenue, N.W., Retail Priority Area established pursuant to the Great Streets Neighborhood Retail Priority Areas Approval Resolution of 2007, effective July 10, 2007 (Res. 17-257; 54 DCR 7194 ).

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 15, 57 DCR 9873
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 15 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).